apertium-hbs.hbs.metadix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--<!DOCTYPE dictionary SYSTEM "/usr/share/apertium/dix.dtd">-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCČĆDDžĐEFGHIJKLLjMNNjOPRSŠTUVZŽabcčćddžđefghijklljmnnjoprsštuvwxyzž</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <!--POS Categories -->
    <sdef n="n" c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="vblex" c="Lexical verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod" c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbser" c="Verb to be"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver" c="Verb to have"/>
    <sdef n="vaux" c="Auxilliary verb"/>
    <sdef n="adj" c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="adv" c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="preadv" c="Preadverb"/>
    <sdef n="det" c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="prn" c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="pers" c="Personal"/>
    <sdef n="pr" c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="num" c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="coll" c="Collective"/>
    <sdef n="np" c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="ij" c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Coordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv" c="Conjunctive adverb"/>
    <!-- POS Subcategories-->
    <!--Gender-->
    <sdef n="f" c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="m" c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="ma" c="Masculine animate"/>
    <sdef n="mi" c="Masculine inanimate"/>
    <sdef n="nt" c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="mfn" c="Masculine/Feminine/Neuter"/>
    <!--Countable/Uncountable-->
    <sdef n="cnt" c="Countable"/>
    <sdef n="unc" c="Uncountable"/>
    <!--Number -->
    <sdef n="sg" c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="du" c="Dual"/>
    <sdef n="sp" c="Singular/Plural"/>
    <sdef n="pl" c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="ND" c="Number to be Determined"/>
    <!--Case-->
    <sdef n="nom" c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="gen" c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="dat" c="Dative"/>
    <sdef n="acc" c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="voc" c="Vocative"/>
    <sdef n="loc" c="Locative"/>
    <sdef n="ins" c="Instrumental"/>
    <!--Tense and mode and stuff-->
    <sdef n="pres" c="Present"/>
    <sdef n="past" c="Past tense"/>
    <sdef n="pmp" c="Plusquamperfect"/><!--Note: Compound, can be made in two different ways (aorist/imperfect of ' to be' plus participle, or perfect of 'to be+participle-->
    <sdef n="imp" c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="inf" c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="pp" c="Passive"/><!--In the mk dictionary this is used to mark the passive participle, so i'll use it here accordingly -->
    <!--Note: passive is compound and a bit complicated, it can look like a reflexive verb, or verb 'biti/bivati'-->
    <!--+ verbal adjective passive -->
    <sdef n="lp" c="L-participle"/><!--Note: this is the active verbal adjective-->
    <sdef n="pprs" c="Present participle"/><!--Note: called "verbal adverb present" or "past", made from imperfective or perfective verbs respectively, maybe to add the category-->
    <sdef n="pri" c="Present indicative"/><!--Note: Technically no subjunctive in the language, perhaps the 'da'+present construction as in macedonian can be viewed as subjunctive--><!-- Noteworthy: when translating into Bosnian, Serbian, Croatian, each language has different prefered rules of style when to express something to use infinitive, and when subjunctive -->
    <sdef n="pii" c="Imperfect"/><!--only for imperfective verbs-->
    <sdef n="aor" c="Aorist"/><!--NOTE: both for imperfective and perfective verbs, however imperfective verbs in aorist have a meaning identical to imperfect!-->

    <sdef n="opt" c="Optative"/><!--Note: Deprecated, it's a matter of function, not morphology. This is realised by the l-participle, only in optative it's always l-participle by itself-->

    <sdef n="cni" c="Imperfect"/><!--Note: Regarding conditional, it's compound, and there're two types of it -->

    <sdef n="futI" c="Future I"/> <!-- compound -->
    <sdef n="futII" c="Future II"/><!-- compound -->

    <sdef n="aff" c="Affirmative"/>
    <sdef n="itg" c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="neg" c="Negative"/>

    <!--Aspect (for verbs) -->
    <sdef n="perf" c="Perfective"/>
    <sdef n="imperf" c="Imperfective"/>

    <!--Transitivity-->
    <sdef n="tv" c="Transitive"/>
    <sdef n="iv" c="Intransitive"/>

    <!-- Proper nouns -->
    <sdef n="ant" c="Antroponym"/>
    <sdef n="top" c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog" c="Surnames"/>
    <sdef n="org" c="Organizations"/>
    <sdef n="al" c="Others"/>

    <sdef n="p1" c="Person 1"/>
    <sdef n="p2" c="Person 2"/>
    <sdef n="p3" c="Person 3"/>
    <sdef n="impers" c="Impersonal"/>

    <!--Adjectives-->
    <sdef n="sint" c="Synthetic"/>
    <sdef n="pst" c="Positive"/>
    <sdef n="comp" c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup" c="Superlative"/>
    <sdef n="ssup" c="Absolute superlative"/><!--Note: This is a category rarely analysed in grammars, made by the suffix pre+positive. However, it's productive both in Bosnian, Croatian, Serbian and Macedonian, so it'd be good to use it at least as a trick (i.e. to translate ssup as прe+positive).-->
    <sdef n="attr" c="Attributive"/> 	<!--Note: These two, they can be also called definite or indefinite-->
    <sdef n="pred" c="Predicative"/>	<!--and are (in some cases?) translated with a definite article when definite-->

    <sdef n="ind" c="Indefinite"/> 		<!--So I'm using these two-->
    <sdef n="def" c="Definite"/> 			<!--instead-->

    <!--Other-->
    <sdef n="predet" c="Predeterminer"/>
    <sdef n="qnt" c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="ord" c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="clt" c="Clitic"/>
    <sdef n="acr" c="Acronym"/>
    <sdef n="rel" c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="dem" c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="tot" c="totalising"/>
    <sdef n="pos" c="Possesive"/>
    <sdef n="ref" c="Reflexive"/>
    <sdef n="dst" c="Distal"/>
    <sdef n="pprep" c="Post preposition"/>
    <sdef n="abbr" c="abbreviation"/>

    <!--Stuff-->
    <sdef n="part" c="Particle"/>

    <!--Punctuation-->
    <sdef n="sent"    c="End of sentence"/>
    <sdef n="cm"      c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"    c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"    c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="apos" c="Apostrophe"/>
    <sdef n="guio" c="Hypen"/>

    <!--Temporary stuff-->
    <sdef n="sfx"    c="suffix"/> <!-- for eg. 1980-ih) -->

  </sdefs>
  <!--Paradigms, for now taken from the current grammar of Croatian by authors: Barić, Lončarić, Malić, Pavešić, Peti, Zečević, Znika-->
  <!-- Currently the Croatian standard allows for short plurals as well as long plurals (i.e. -i alongside -ovi), in some exotic cases
       I have added those for the sake of analysis -->
  <!-- in generation the long plurals are default, which are allowed in all standards -->
  <pardefs>

    <pardef n="Mrle__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ta</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tu</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ta</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tu</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tu</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tom</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ta</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tima</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tima</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tima</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Mirče"><i>Mirče</i><par n="Mrle__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mrle"><i>Mrle</i><par n="Mrle__np"/></e>
